Utah statutes.
63B-7-106.   Constitutional debt limitation.
(1)  The commission may not issue bonds under this chapter in an amount that
violates the limitation described in Utah Constitution Article XIV, Section 1.
(2)  For purposes of applying the debt limitation contained in Utah
Constitution Article XIV, Section 1, the value of the taxable property in Utah
is considered to be 100% of the fair market value of the taxable property of
the state, as computed from the last assessment for state purposes previous to
the issuance of the bonds.
